California, session 20252026, AB620.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 44274.16 is added to the Health and Safety Code, immediately following Section 44274.15, to read:44274.16. For any regulation adopted or amended pursuant to this article to develop or implement the program, or any other regulation adopted or amended regarding the procurement or use of medium- and heavy-duty zero-emission vehicles by a public or private fleet, the state board shall consider all of the following regarding the rental of medium- and heavy-duty zero-emission vehicles:(a) That customers, not rental companies, drive rental vehicles and are responsible for the miles driven and any associated emissions.(b) The role that rental or shared mobility of medium- and heavy-duty zero-emission vehicles can play in helping obligated entities comply with regulations in a more cost-effective and flexible manner.(c) The role that rental or shared mobility of medium- and heavy-duty zero-emission vehicles can play in exposing customers to medium- and heavy-duty zero-emission vehicle technology and related charging infrastructure and educating them about associated benefits, including lower maintenance and fuel costs.(d) The public health, air quality, and climate benefits of minimizing vehicle miles traveled of fossil-fueled medium- and heavy-duty vehicles, or of increasing vehicle miles traveled of medium- and heavy-duty zero-emission vehicles via rental vehicles.(e) The environmental and supply chain benefits of renting medium- and heavy-duty zero-emission vehicles compared to procuring them.